Washington statutes.
RCW 39.86.150

Reallocation process and carryforwards.

(1) Beginning July 1st of each calendar year, the agency may allocate or reallocate any portions of the annual state tax-exempt private activity bond ceiling for which no certificate of approval is in effect. Reallocations may also be made from the remainder category at any time during the year.

(2) Prior to the end of each calendar year, the agency shall allocate or reallocate any unused portions of the state ceiling among one or more issuers as carryforward, to be used within three years, in accordance with the code and relevant criteria described in RCW 39.86.130.

(3) Reallocations of state bond ceilings other than the annual tax-exempt private activity bond ceiling may be made by the agency in accordance with the code or as established in agency rule when not specified in the code.

[ 2010 1st sp.s. c 6 s 9; 1987 c 297 s 6.]

NOTES:

Short title—2010 1st sp.s. c 6: See note following RCW 43.180.160.